District of Columbia statutes.
2-1008

Appropriations.

There are hereby authorized to be appropriated, out of any moneys in the Treasury of the United States not otherwise appropriated and in any appropriate appropriation act other than the annual District of Columbia appropriation act, such sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of §§ 2-1001 to 2-1008, any existing provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

June 6, 1924, ch. 270, § 10
July 19, 1952, 66 Stat. 791, ch. 949, § 1
1981 Ed., § 1-2008.
1973 Ed., § 1-1010.